Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,102
Long-term acute care hospitals; enroll as providers.

The department shall enroll long-term acute care hospitals in Nebraska as providers eligible to receive funding under the medical assistance program.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 58.